Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.672

Bureau of forensic laboratory services—Drug evidence analysis. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington state patrol bureau of forensic laboratory services shall aim to complete the necessary analysis for any evidence submitted for a suspected violation of RCW 69.50.4011(1) (b) or (c), 69.50.4013, 69.50.4014, or 69.41.030(2) (b) or (c) within 45 days of receipt of the request for analysis.

The Washington state patrol bureau of forensic laboratory services' failure to comply with this section shall not constitute grounds for dismissal of a criminal charge.

[ 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 sp.s. c 1 s 6: "Section 6 of this act takes effect January 1, 2025." [ 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 40.]